District of Columbia statutes.
9-505

Failure to furnish, erect, maintain, move, or discontinue street lamps.

Any gaslight company or any electric light company doing business in the District of Columbia, which shall fail or refuse to furnish, erect, maintain, move, or discontinue any street lamp in compliance with the foregoing provisions as the Mayor of the District of Columbia may direct, shall be subject to a penalty of $25 for each and every day’s failure or refusal so to do, to be recovered at law in the name of the District of Columbia in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1011, ch. 192, § 8
This section is referenced in § 28-3812.
1981 Ed., § 7-705.
1973 Ed., § 7-705.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.